Massachusetts, session 194th, H4774.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. There shall be established a trust to be known as the City of Cambridge 
Employment and Job Training Trust hereinafter referred to as the Trust. The purpose of the Trust 
shall be to assist in the creation and maintenance of employment opportunities within the city of 
Cambridge for the residents of the city of Cambridge through employment and job training 
services. 
SECTION 2. There shall be established a board of trustees hereinafter referred to as the 
board, which shall include no fewer than 5 and no more than 9 trustees, including ex officio the 
Cambridge city manager or designee. Those members of the board who are not serving in an ex 
officio capacity shall be appointed by the city manager and shall be designated as public agents 
for purposes of the Constitution of the commonwealth. 
SECTION 3. The powers of the board, all of which shall be carried on in furtherance of 
the purposes set forth in this act, shall include, but not be limited to, the following: 

of 4 13  (a) to receive and accept personal property, by gift, grant, devise or transfer from any 
federal, state or local governmental or other public entity, or any person, trust, corporation or 
other private entity, including without limitation funds or other personal property tendered to the 
Trust in connection with the Cambridge zoning ordinance; 
(b) to retain personal property, including without limitation personal property that is 
uninvested and investments that yield no income or yield a high rate of income; 
(c) to make grants for the Trust’s purposes upon such terms as the board deems 
advisable; 
(d) to make loans for the Trust’s purposes upon such terms of repayment or otherwise as 
the board deems advisable and to extend the time for payment of any obligation of the Trust; 
(e) to sell, exchange or transfer personal property of the Trust for such consideration and 
upon such terms as the board deems advisable; 
(f) to execute, acknowledge and deliver assignments, transfers, pledges, contracts, 
promissory notes, releases and other instruments, sealed or unsealed, necessary, proper or 
incidental to any transaction involving the Trust’s assets that the board engages for the 
accomplishment of the purposes of the Trust; 
(g) to employ advisors and agents, including without limitation accountants and 
appraisers, and to delegate to such persons or firms such ministerial or discretionary powers as 
the board deems necessary; 
(h) to pay reasonable compensation to all advisors and agents and to apportion such 
compensation between income and principal as the board deems advisable; 

of 4 34  (i) to apportion receipts and charges between income and principal as the board deems 
advisable; 
(j) to exercise all powers and rights, including proxies and powers of attorney, necessary 
and proper in connection with the ownership of any securities held as part of the Trust’s personal 
property; 
(k) to compromise, arbitrate, defend, enforce, release, settle or otherwise adjust claims in 
favor of or against the Trust and to accept any personal property, either in total or partial 
satisfaction of any indebtedness or other obligation, and subject to the provisions of this act, to 
continue to hold the same for such period of time as the board may deem advisable; and 
(l) to exercise all other powers authorized by common law, statute, the Constitution or 
other provisions of this act. 
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, all monies paid 
to the Trust by public or private contribution or in accordance with the Cambridge zoning 
ordinance shall be paid directly into the Trust and such monies do not have to be appropriated or 
accepted and approved into the Trust. General revenues appropriated into the Trust shall become 
Trust property and to be expended, these funds do not need to be further appropriated. All 
monies remaining in the Trust at the end of any fiscal year, whether or not expended by the 
board within 1 year of the date they were appropriated into the Trust, shall remain Trust 
property. 
SECTION 5. The Trust is a public employer and the members of the board are public 
employees for purposes of chapter 258 of the General Laws. 

of 4 55  SECTION 6. The Trust shall be deemed a municipal agency and the trustees special 
municipal employees for purposes of chapter 268A of the General Laws. 
SECTION 7. The Trust is a governmental body for purposes of sections 18 to 25, 
inclusive, of chapter 30A of the General Laws. 
SECTION 8. The Trust is exempt from chapters 59 and 62 of the General Laws and from 
any other provisions concerning the payment of taxes based upon or measured by personal 
property or income imposed by the commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof. 
SECTION 9. The books and records of the Trust shall be audited annually by an 
independent auditor in accordance with accepted accounting practices. 
SECTION 10. The declaration of trust, which establishes and controls the Trust, as 
provided in this act, shall be filed in the office of the Cambridge city clerk. 
SECTION 11. The Trust is a board of the city for purposes of chapter 30B of the General 
Laws and section 15A of chapter 40 of the General Laws; provided, however, that agreements 
and conveyances between the Trust and agencies, boards, commissions, authorities, departments 
and public instrumentalities of the city of Cambridge shall be exempt from the provisions of said 
chapter 30B. 
SECTION 12. The board shall at least annually, and additionally upon request of the city 
manager, file a written report with the city manager of its activities for the reporting year and an 
accounting of its receipts and expenditures. 
SECTION 13. This act shall take effect upon its passage.